North Dakota statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Relations and Persons
CHAPTER 14-20 Uniform Parentage Act

14-20-01. (101)
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the Uniform Parentage Act.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-02. (102)
Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Acknowledged father” means a man who has established a father-child relationship under sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24.

“Adjudicated father” means a man who has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to be the father of a child.

“Alleged father” means a man who alleges himself to be, or is alleged to be, the genetic father or a possible genetic father of a child, but whose paternity has not been determined. The term does not include:

A presumed father;

A man whose parental rights have been terminated or declared not to exist; or

A male donor.

“Assisted reproduction” means a method of causing pregnancy other than sexual intercourse. The term includes:

Intrauterine insemination;

Donation of eggs;

Donation of embryos;

In vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and

Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.

“Child” means an individual of any age whose parentage may be determined under this chapter.

“Commence” means to file the initial pleading seeking an adjudication of parentage in the district court of this state.

“Determination of parentage” means the establishment of the parent-child relationship by the signing of a valid acknowledgment of paternity under sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24 or adjudication by the court.

“Donor” means an individual who produces eggs or sperm used for assisted reproduction, whether or not for consideration. The term does not include:

A husband who provides sperm, or a wife who provides eggs, to be used for assisted reproduction by the wife;

A woman who gives birth to a child by means of assisted reproduction;

A parent under sections 14-20-59 through 14-20-65; or

An individual whose body produces sperm or egg used for the purpose of conceiving a child for that individual.

“Ethnic or racial group” means, for purposes of genetic testing, a recognized group that an individual identifies as all or part of the individual’s ancestry or that is so identified by other information.

“Genetic testing” means an analysis of genetic markers to exclude or identify a man as the father or a woman as the mother of a child. The term includes an analysis of one or a combination of the following:

Deoxyribonucleic acid; and

Blood-group antigens, red-cell antigens, human-leukocyte antigens, serum enzymes, serum proteins, or red-cell enzymes.

“Gestational carrier” means an adult woman who enters into an agreement to have an embryo implanted in her and bear the resulting child for intended parents, where the embryo is conceived by using the egg and sperm of the intended parents.

“Man” means a male individual of any age.

“Parent” means an individual who has established a parent-child relationship under section 14-20-07.

“Parent-child relationship” means the legal relationship between a child and a parent of the child. The term includes the mother-child relationship and the father-child relationship.

“Paternity index” means the likelihood of paternity calculated by computing the ratio between:

The likelihood that the tested man is the father, based on genetic markers of the tested man, mother, and child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested man is the father of the child; and

The likelihood that the tested man is not the father, based on the genetic markers of the tested man, mother, and child, conditioned on the hypothesis that the tested man is not the father of the child and that the father is of the same ethnic or racial group as the tested man.

“Presumed father” means a man who, by operation of law under section 14-20-10, is recognized as the father of a child until that status is rebutted or confirmed in a judicial proceeding.

“Probability of paternity” means the measure, for the ethnic or racial group to which the alleged father belongs, of the probability that the man in question is the father of the child, compared with a random, unrelated man of the same ethnic or racial group, expressed as a percentage incorporating the paternity index and a prior probability.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Signatory” means an individual who authenticates a record and is bound by its terms.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Support enforcement agency” means a public official or agency authorized to seek:

Enforcement of support orders or laws relating to the duty of support;

Establishment or modification of child support;

Determination of parentage; or

Location of child support obligors and their income and assets.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-03. (103)
Scope — Choice of law.

This chapter applies to determination of parentage in this state.

The court shall apply the law of this state to adjudicate the parent-child relationship. The applicable law does not depend on:

The place of birth of the child; or

The past or present residence of the child.

This chapter does not create, enlarge, or diminish parental rights or duties under other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-04.
(104)
Courts of this state.

The district court is authorized to adjudicate parentage under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-05. (105)
Protection of participants.

Proceedings under this chapter are subject to other law of this state governing the health, safety, privacy, and liberty of a child or other individual who could be jeopardized by disclosure of identifying information, including address, telephone number, place of employment, social security number, and the child’s day care facility and school.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-06. (106)
Determination of maternity.

Provisions of this chapter relating to determination of paternity apply to determinations of maternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-07. (201)
Establishment of parent-child relationship.

The mother-child relationship is established between a woman and a child by:

The woman’s having given birth to the child;

An adjudication of the woman’s maternity; or

Adoption of the child by the woman.

The father-child relationship is established between a man and a child by:

An unrebutted presumption of the man’s paternity of the child under section 14-20-10;

An effective acknowledgment of paternity by the man under sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24, unless the acknowledgment has been rescinded or successfully challenged;

An adjudication of the man’s paternity;

Adoption of the child by the man; or

The man’s having consented to assisted reproduction by a woman under sections 14-20-59 through 14-20-65 which resulted in the birth of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-08. (202)
No discrimination based on marital status.

A child born to parents who are not married to each other has the same rights under the law as a child born to parents who are married to each other.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-09. (203)
Consequences of establishment of parentage.

Unless parental rights are terminated, a parent-child relationship established under this chapter applies for all purposes, except as otherwise specifically provided by other law of this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-10. (204)
Presumption of paternity. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

A man is presumed to be the father of a child if:

He and the mother of the child are married to each other and the child is born during the marriage;

He and the mother of the child were married to each other and the child is born within three hundred days after the marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce, or after a decree of separation;

Before the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with law, even if the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the child is born during the invalid marriage or within three hundred days after its termination by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce, or after a decree of separation;

After the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with law, whether or not the marriage is or could be declared invalid, and he voluntarily asserted his paternity of the child, and:

The assertion is in a record filed with the state department of health;

He agreed to be and is named as the child’s father on the child’s birth certificate; or

He promised in a record to support the child as his own; or

For the first two years of the child’s life, he resided in the same household with the child and openly held out the child as his own.

A presumption of paternity established under this section may be rebutted only by an adjudication under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-10. (204)
Presumption of paternity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

A man is presumed to be the father of a child if:

He and the mother of the child are married to each other and the child is born during the marriage;

He and the mother of the child were married to each other and the child is born within three hundred days after the marriage is terminated by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce, or after a decree of separation;

Before the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with law, even if the attempted marriage is or could be declared invalid, and the child is born during the invalid marriage or within three hundred days after its termination by death, annulment, declaration of invalidity, divorce, or after a decree of separation;

After the birth of the child, he and the mother of the child married each other in apparent compliance with law, whether or not the marriage is or could be declared invalid, and he voluntarily asserted his paternity of the child, and:

The assertion is in a record filed with the department of health and human services;

He agreed to be and is named as the child’s father on the child’s birth certificate; or

He promised in a record to support the child as his own; or

For the first two years of the child’s life, he resided in the same household with the child and openly held out the child as his own.

A presumption of paternity established under this section may be rebutted only by an adjudication under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 55, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-11. (301)
Acknowledgment of paternity.

The mother of a child and a man claiming to be the genetic father of the child may sign an acknowledgment of paternity with intent to establish the man’s paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-12. (302)
Execution of acknowledgment of paternity. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

An acknowledgment of paternity must:

Be in a record;

Be signed, or otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury by the mother and by the man seeking to establish his paternity;

State that the child whose paternity is being acknowledged:

Does not have a presumed father, or has a presumed father whose full name is stated; and

Does not have another acknowledged or adjudicated father;

State whether there has been genetic testing and, if so, that the acknowledging man’s claim of paternity is consistent with the results of the testing; and

State that the signatories understand that the acknowledgment is the equivalent of a judicial adjudication of paternity of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred after two years.

An acknowledgment of paternity is void if it:

States that another man is a presumed father, unless a denial of paternity signed or otherwise authenticated by the presumed father is filed with the state department of health;

States that another man is an acknowledged or adjudicated father; or

Falsely denies the existence of a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father of the child.

A presumed father may sign or otherwise authenticate an acknowledgment of paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2017, ch. 57, § 3, effective August 1, 2017.

Collateral References.

Requirements and Effects of Putative Father Registries, 28 A.L.R.6th 349.

14-20-12. (302)
Execution of acknowledgment of paternity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

An acknowledgment of paternity must:

Be in a record;

Be signed, or otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury by the mother and by the man seeking to establish his paternity;

State that the child whose paternity is being acknowledged:

Does not have a presumed father, or has a presumed father whose full name is stated; and

Does not have another acknowledged or adjudicated father;

State whether there has been genetic testing and, if so, that the acknowledging man’s claim of paternity is consistent with the results of the testing; and

State that the signatories understand that the acknowledgment is the equivalent of a judicial adjudication of paternity of the child and that a challenge to the acknowledgment is permitted only under limited circumstances and is barred after two years.

An acknowledgment of paternity is void if it:

States that another man is a presumed father, unless a denial of paternity signed or otherwise authenticated by the presumed father is filed with the department of health and human services;

States that another man is an acknowledged or adjudicated father; or

Falsely denies the existence of a presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father of the child.

A presumed father may sign or otherwise authenticate an acknowledgment of paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2017, ch. 57, § 3, effective August 1, 2017; 2021, ch. 352, § 56, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-13. (303)
Denial of paternity.

A presumed father may sign a denial of his paternity. The denial is valid only if:

An acknowledgment of paternity signed, or otherwise authenticated, by another man is filed pursuant to section 14-20-15;

The denial is in a record, and is signed, or otherwise authenticated, under penalty of perjury; and

The presumed father has not previously:

Acknowledged his paternity, unless the previous acknowledgment has been rescinded pursuant to section 14-20-17 or successfully challenged pursuant to section 14-20-18; or

Been adjudicated to be the father of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-14. (304)
Rules for acknowledgment and denial of paternity. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

An acknowledgment of paternity and a denial of paternity may be contained in a single document or may be signed in counterparts, and may be filed separately or simultaneously. If the acknowledgment and denial are both necessary, neither is valid until both are filed.

An acknowledgment of paternity or a denial of paternity may be signed before the birth of the child.

Subject to subsection 1, an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity takes effect on the birth of the child or the filing of the document with the state department of health, whichever occurs later.

An acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity signed by a minor is valid if it is otherwise in compliance with this chapter.

An acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may be completed for a child who was not born in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-14. (304)
Rules for acknowledgment and denial of paternity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

An acknowledgment of paternity and a denial of paternity may be contained in a single document or may be signed in counterparts, and may be filed separately or simultaneously. If the acknowledgment and denial are both necessary, neither is valid until both are filed.

An acknowledgment of paternity or a denial of paternity may be signed before the birth of the child.

Subject to subsection 1, an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity takes effect on the birth of the child or the filing of the document with the department of health and human services, whichever occurs later.

An acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity signed by a minor is valid if it is otherwise in compliance with this chapter.

An acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may be completed for a child who was not born in this state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 57, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-15. (305)
Effect of acknowledgment or denial of paternity. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-20-17 and 14-20-18, a valid acknowledgment of paternity filed with the state department of health is equivalent to an adjudication of paternity of a child and confers upon the acknowledged father all of the rights and duties of a parent and must be recognized as a basis for a support order in any proceeding to establish, enforce, or modify a support order.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-20-17 and 14-20-18, a valid denial of paternity by a presumed father filed with the state department of health in conjunction with a valid acknowledgment of paternity is equivalent to an adjudication of the nonpaternity of the presumed father and discharges the presumed father from all rights and duties of a parent.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

Collateral References.

Requirements and Effects of Putative Father Registries, 28 A.L.R.6th 349.

14-20-15. (305)
Effect of acknowledgment or denial of paternity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-20-17 and 14-20-18, a valid acknowledgment of paternity filed with the department of health and human services is equivalent to an adjudication of paternity of a child and confers upon the acknowledged father all of the rights and duties of a parent and must be recognized as a basis for a support order in any proceeding to establish, enforce, or modify a support order.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-20-17 and 14-20-18, a valid denial of paternity by a presumed father filed with the department of health and human services in conjunction with a valid acknowledgment of paternity is equivalent to an adjudication of the nonpaternity of the presumed father and discharges the presumed father from all rights and duties of a parent.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 58, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-16. (306)
No filing fee. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may not charge for filing an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-16. (306)
No filing fee. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may not charge for filing an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 59, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-17. (307)
Proceeding for rescission.

A signatory may rescind an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity by commencing a proceeding to rescind before the earlier of:

Sixty days after the effective date of the acknowledgment or denial, as provided in section 14-20-14; or

The date of the first hearing, in a proceeding to which the signatory is a party, before a court to adjudicate an issue relating to the child, including a proceeding that establishes support.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-18. (308)
Challenge after expiration of period for rescission. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

After the period for rescission under section 14-20-17 has expired, a signatory of an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may commence a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial only:

On the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake of fact; and

Within two years after the acknowledgment or denial is filed with the state department of health.

A party challenging an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity has the burden of proof.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2013, ch. 124, § 5.

14-20-18. (308)
Challenge after expiration of period for rescission. [Effective September 1, 2022]

After the period for rescission under section 14-20-17 has expired, a signatory of an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity may commence a proceeding to challenge the acknowledgment or denial only:

On the basis of fraud, duress, or material mistake of fact; and

Within two years after the acknowledgment or denial is filed with the department of health and human services.

A party challenging an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity has the burden of proof.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2013, ch. 124, § 5; 2021, ch. 352, § 60, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-19. (309)
Procedure for rescission or challenge. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

Every signatory to an acknowledgment of paternity and any related denial of paternity must be made a party to a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial.

For the purpose of rescission of, or challenge to, an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction of this state by signing the acknowledgment or denial, effective upon the filing of the document with the state department of health.

Except for good cause shown, during the pendency of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, the court may not suspend the legal responsibilities of a signatory arising from the acknowledgment, including the duty to pay child support.

A proceeding to rescind or to challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity must be conducted in the same manner as a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58.

At the conclusion of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, the court shall order the state department of health to amend the birth record of the child, if appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-19. (309)
Procedure for rescission or challenge. [Effective September 1, 2022]

Every signatory to an acknowledgment of paternity and any related denial of paternity must be made a party to a proceeding to rescind or challenge the acknowledgment or denial.

For the purpose of rescission of, or challenge to, an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, a signatory submits to personal jurisdiction of this state by signing the acknowledgment or denial, effective upon the filing of the document with the department of health and human services.

Except for good cause shown, during the pendency of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, the court may not suspend the legal responsibilities of a signatory arising from the acknowledgment, including the duty to pay child support.

A proceeding to rescind or to challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity must be conducted in the same manner as a proceeding to adjudicate parentage under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58.

At the conclusion of a proceeding to rescind or challenge an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity, the court shall order the department of health and human services to amend the birth record of the child, if appropriate.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 61, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-20. (310)
Ratification barred.

A court or administrative agency conducting a judicial or administrative proceeding is not required or permitted to ratify an unchallenged acknowledgment of paternity.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-21. (311)
Full faith and credit.

A court of this state shall give full faith and credit to an acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity effective in another state if the acknowledgment or denial has been signed and is otherwise in compliance with the law of the other state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-22. (312)
Forms for acknowledgment and denial of paternity. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

To facilitate compliance with sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24, the state department of health shall prescribe forms for the acknowledgment of paternity and the denial of paternity.

A valid acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity is not affected by a later modification of the prescribed form.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-22. (312)
Forms for acknowledgment and denial of paternity. [Effective September 1, 2022]

To facilitate compliance with sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24, the department of health and human services shall prescribe forms for the acknowledgment of paternity and the denial of paternity.

A valid acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity is not affected by a later modification of the prescribed form.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 62, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-23. (313)
Release of information. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may release information relating to the acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity to a signatory of the acknowledgment or denial and to courts and appropriate state or federal agencies of this or another state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-23. (313)
Release of information. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may release information relating to the acknowledgment of paternity or denial of paternity to a signatory of the acknowledgment or denial and to courts and appropriate state or federal agencies of this or another state.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 63, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-24. (314)
Adoption of rules. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

The state department of health may adopt rules to implement sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-23.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-24. (314)
Adoption of rules. [Effective September 1, 2022]

The department of health and human services may adopt rules to implement sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-23.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9; 2021, ch. 352, § 64, effective September 1, 2022.

14-20-25. (501)
Scope.

Sections 14-20-25 through 14-20-35 govern genetic testing of an individual to determine parentage, whether the individual:

Voluntarily submits to testing; or

Is tested pursuant to an order of the court or a support enforcement agency.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-26. (502)
Order for testing.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 14-20-25 through 14-20-58, the court shall order the child and other designated individuals to submit to genetic testing if the request for testing is supported by the sworn statement of a party to the proceeding:

Alleging paternity and stating facts establishing a reasonable probability of the requisite sexual contact between the individuals; or

Denying paternity and stating facts establishing a possibility that sexual contact between the individuals, if any, did not result in the conception of the child.

A support enforcement agency may order genetic testing only if there is no presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father.

If a request for genetic testing of a child is made before birth, the court or support enforcement agency may not order in utero testing.

If two or more men are subject to court-ordered genetic testing, the testing may be ordered concurrently or sequentially.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-27. (503)
Requirements for genetic testing.

Genetic testing must be of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed in a testing laboratory accredited by:

The American association of blood banks, or a successor to its functions;

The American society for histocompatibility and immunogenetics, or a successor to its functions; or

An accrediting body designated by the U.S. secretary of health and human services.

A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of one or more samples, or a combination of samples, of blood, buccal cells, bone, hair, or other body tissue or fluid. The specimen used in the testing need not be of the same kind for each individual undergoing genetic testing.

Based on the ethnic or racial group of an individual, the testing laboratory shall determine the databases from which to select frequencies for use in calculation of the probability of paternity. If there is a disagreement as to the testing laboratory’s choice, the following rules apply:

The individual objecting may require the testing laboratory, within thirty days after receipt of the report of the test, to recalculate the probability of paternity using an ethnic or racial group different from that used by the laboratory.

The individual objecting to the testing laboratory’s initial choice shall:

If the frequencies are not available to the testing laboratory for the ethnic or racial group requested, provide the requested frequencies compiled in a manner recognized by accrediting bodies; or

Engage another testing laboratory to perform the calculations.

The testing laboratory may use its own statistical estimate if there is a question regarding which ethnic or racial group is appropriate. If available, the testing laboratory shall calculate the frequencies using statistics for any other ethnic or racial group requested.

If, after recalculation using a different ethnic or racial group, genetic testing does not rebuttably identify a man as the father of a child under section 14-20-29, an individual who has been tested may be required to submit to additional genetic testing.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-28. (504)
Report of genetic testing.

A report of genetic testing must be in a record and signed under penalty of perjury by a designee of the testing laboratory. A report made under the requirements of sections 14-20-25 through 14-20-35 is self-authenticating.

Documentation from the testing laboratory of the following information is sufficient to establish a reliable chain of custody that allows the results of genetic testing to be admissible without testimony:

The names and photographs of the individuals whose specimens have been taken;

The names of the individuals who collected the specimens;

The places and dates the specimens were collected;

The names of the individuals who received the specimens in the testing laboratory; and

The dates the specimens were received.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-29. (505)
Genetic testing results — Rebuttal.

Under this chapter, a man is rebuttably identified as the father of a child if the genetic testing complies with sections 14-20-25 through 14-20-35 and the results disclose that:

The man has at least a ninety-nine percent probability of paternity, using a prior probability of five-tenths, as calculated by using the combined paternity index obtained in the testing; and

A combined paternity index of at least one hundred to one.

A man identified under subsection 1 as the father of the child may rebut the genetic testing results only by other genetic testing satisfying the requirements of sections 14-20-25 through 14-20-35 which:

Excludes the man as a genetic father of the child; or

Identifies another man as the possible father of the child.

Except as otherwise provided in section 14-20-34, if more than one man is identified by genetic testing as the possible father of the child, the court shall order them to submit to further genetic testing to identify the genetic father.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-30. (506)
Costs of genetic testing.

Subject to assessment of costs under sections 14-20-36 through 14-20-58, the cost of initial genetic testing must be advanced:

By a support enforcement agency in a proceeding in which the support enforcement agency is providing services;

By the individual who made the request;

As agreed by the parties; or

As ordered by the court.

In cases in which the cost is advanced by the support enforcement agency, the agency may seek reimbursement from a man who is rebuttably identified as the father.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-31. (507)
Additional genetic testing.

The court or the support enforcement agency shall order additional genetic testing upon the request of a party who contests the result of the original testing. If the previous genetic testing identified a man as the father of the child under section 14-20-29, the court or agency may not order additional testing unless the party provides advance payment for the testing.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-32. (508)
Genetic testing when specimens not available.

Subject to subsection 2, if a genetic-testing specimen is not available from a man who may be the father of a child, for good cause and under circumstances the court considers to be just, the court may order the following individuals to submit specimens for genetic testing:

The parents of the man;

Brothers and sisters of the man;

Other children of the man and their mothers; and

Other relatives of the man necessary to complete genetic testing.

Issuance of an order under this section requires a finding that a need for genetic testing outweighs the legitimate interests of the individual sought to be tested.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-33. (509)
Deceased individual.

For good cause shown, the court may order genetic testing of a deceased individual.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-34. (510)
Identical brothers.

The court may order genetic testing of a brother of a man identified as the father of a child if the man is commonly believed to have an identical brother and evidence suggests that the brother may be the genetic father of the child.

If each brother satisfies the requirements as the identified father of the child under section 14-20-29 without consideration of another identical brother being identified as the father of the child, the court may rely on nongenetic evidence to adjudicate which brother is the father of the child.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-35. (511)
Confidentiality of genetic testing.

The report of genetic testing for parentage is confidential. An individual who knowingly releases an identifiable specimen of another individual for any purpose other than that relevant to the proceeding regarding parentage without a court order or the written permission of the individual who furnished the specimen is subject to section 12.1-13-01.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-36. (601)
Proceeding authorized.

A civil proceeding may be maintained to adjudicate the parentage of a child. The proceeding is governed by the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-37. (602)
Standing to maintain proceeding.

Subject to sections 14-20-11 through 14-20-24 and sections 14-20-42 and 14-20-44, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be maintained by:

The child;

The mother of the child;

A man whose paternity of the child is to be adjudicated;

The support enforcement agency;

An authorized adoption agency or licensed child-placing agency; or

A representative authorized by law to act for an individual who would otherwise be entitled to maintain a proceeding but who is deceased, incapacitated, or a minor.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-38. (603)
Parties to proceeding.

The following individuals must be joined as parties in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage:

The mother of the child; and

A man whose paternity of the child is to be adjudicated.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-39. (604)
Personal jurisdiction.

An individual may not be adjudicated to be a parent unless the court has personal jurisdiction over the individual.

A court of this state having jurisdiction to adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the individual, if the conditions prescribed in section 14-12.2-04 are fulfilled.

Lack of jurisdiction over one individual does not preclude the court from making an adjudication of parentage binding on another individual over whom the court has personal jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-40. (605)
Venue.

Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage is in the county of this state in which:

The child resides or is found;

The respondent resides or is found if the child does not reside in this state; or

A proceeding for probate or administration of the presumed or alleged father’s estate has been commenced.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-41. (606)
No limitation — Child having no presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father.

A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child having no presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated father may be commenced at any time, even after:

The child becomes an adult, but only if the child initiates the proceeding; or

An earlier proceeding to adjudicate paternity has been dismissed based on the application of a statute of limitation then in effect.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.

14-20-42. (607)
Limitation — Child having presumed father.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, a proceeding brought by a presumed father, the mother, or another individual to adjudicate the parentage of a child having a presumed father must be commenced not later than two years after the birth of the child.

A proceeding seeking to disprove the father-child relationship between a child and the child’s presumed father may be maintained at any time if the court determines that:

The presumed father and the mother of the child neither cohabited nor engaged in sexual intercourse with each other during the probable time of conception; and

The presumed father never openly held out the child as his own.

For purposes of this section and section 14-20-43, an action to establish support for a child is a proceeding to adjudicate parentage if the child’s presumed father raises nonpaternity as a defense to the action.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 135, § 9.